Rhode Island, session 2025, SB564.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-72-36.3 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-72 entitled
"Department of Children, Youth and Families" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-72-36.3. Reporting.
(a) Annual reports showing progress in residential-care system reform and rebalancing
shall be submitted by April 1, 2017, and annually thereafter on or before April 1 of each year by
the department to the finance committees of both the senate and the house of representatives and
shall include:
(1) The number of congregate-care placements and associated funds;
(2) The number of foster-care placements and associated funds;
(3) The percentage of screenings completed within thirty (30) days of placement;
(4) Recommendations to promote the expansion of foster homes and community-based
service capacity, including payment methodology reforms, that increase access to foster homes and
community-based services; and
(5) Recommendations for options to pay for certain services and supports necessary to
transition or divert children from restrictive settings and optimize their health and safety when
receiving care in a home or the community.
(b) The department shall, no later than January 1, 2026, submit a report to the governor,
speaker of the house and president of the senate on the department's progress and accomplishments

in compliance with the family first prevention services act, Pub. L. 115-123 (“FFPSA”). The report
shall assess the impact of evidence-based programs (“EBPs”) conducted in compliance with the
FFPSA and analyze the department's success in keeping children out of the foster care system. The
report shall be made publicly available on the DCYF website, and shall include, but not be limited
to:
(1) A detailed account of the increase in the availability of EBPs to high-risk families
through the FFPSA, including the number of families served and a breakdown of the specific types
of EBPs available;
(2) The number of families identified as high risk for out-of-home placement prior to
participation in an EBP who are now no longer considered high risk following their participation
in the program, including any follow-up data on the continued stability of these families;
(3) Data on families that were reunified, comparing the amount of time it took for
reunification efforts to succeed for families that participated in EBPs funded through the FFPSA to
those families that did not have access to or did not participate in EBPs. The report should also
identify any patterns or trends in the timing and success of reunifications between the two (2)
groups; and
(4) Any other information deemed relevant by the department in evaluating the success or
effectiveness of EBPs associated with FFPSA.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002149
========
LC002149 - Page 2 of 3